Privacy Statement
Privacy Statement
Change cookie usage
We take the protection of your private data very seriously and want you to feel safe while visiting our website. You can visit our website without sharing information about your person.
Personal data is only collected if you voluntarily share it within the framework of specific services, such as downloads, contact forms, subscriptions to newsletters and events.
We place great value on transparency in the storage, processing and use of your personal data and would like to inform you in this Privacy Statement of how we handle your data as well as your rights in this regard.
Name and contact information of the controller
The controller of the processing of your personal data is
Kapsch TrafficCom AG
Am Europlatz 2, 1120 Vienna, Austria
P +43 50 811 0
F +43 50 811 2109
ktc.info@kapsch.net
c/o Data Protection Officer
Am Europlatz 2, 1120 Vienna, Austria
privacy@kapsch.net
Processing activities
1) Website use
Purpose and scope
Every time our website
www.kapsch.net
is loaded, our system automatically collects data and information from the loading computer system.
The following data is automatically collected by means of log files:
Browser type and version used
Operating system of the user
Internet service provider of the user
IP address, Date and time of the access
Websites from which the user’s system arrives at our internet page
Websites that are loaded from our website by the user’s system
With regard to the cookies generated by us via the website, please refer to the separate
Cookie Policy
.
We process your personal data in order to identify, prevent and investigate attacks on our website. The storing of the IP address by the system is required in order to enable delivery of the website to the computer of the user. For this purpose, the IP address of the user must remain stored for the duration of the session. Data is also stored in log files in order to ensure the functionality of the website and for optimization of the website.
Legal basis
The temporary saving of specific data is required for the security of our IT systems and in order to offer you a user-friendly surfing experience, which is why our legitimate interest as defined by Art. 6 para. 1 point f GDPR forms the legal basis for our processing.
The collection of the data for delivery of the website and saving of data in log files is absolutely required for the operation of the website. Therefore, no right to object according to Art. 21 GDPR exists.
Data recipients
For the operation and administration of the website, we make use of IT service providers who on our behalf and under our instructions sometimes also have access to personal data in order to provide the ordered IT services.
Your data will not be shared with other third parties for their own purposes without your consent.
Storage duration
The data relating to the visit to the website is deleted or anonymized at the end of your visit. Further storage beyond this time is possible. In this case, however, the IP addresses of the users are deleted or altered such that association with the visiting client is no longer possible.
2) Optimization of the user experience
Purpose and scope
Each time our website
www.kapsch.net
is called up, our system automatically collects data and information from the computer system of the calling computer. The following data is collected automatically:
IP address, date and time of access
user ID
Country, region, city
Browser type and the version used as well as language
Operating system of the user
Title and URL of the pages the user visits on our website
Files that were clicked and downloaded
Websites from which the user's system accesses our website
Websites that are accessed by the user's system via our website
For the cookies we collect through the website, please refer to our own
Cookie Policy
.
Processing your personal data helps us to identify what works and what does not on our website. For example, we can determine whether the way we communicate is appealing or not, and how we can better design the structure of the website. Our team benefits from the processing of your personal data and is directly involved in the website. By processing your personal data, you can benefit from an ever-improving website.
Without the data, we would not be able to provide you with the service we currently offer. Your data will only be used to improve the user experience on our website and to help you find the information you are looking for. The data will not be used for marketing purposes.
Legal basis
The temporary storage of certain data is necessary to provide you with a user-friendly browsing experience, so the legal basis for the processing is our legitimate interest as defined in Art. 6 (1) lit. f DSGVO.
Recipients of data
The analysis software is operated by external service providers, to whom all data necessary for this purpose is transmitted. Your data will not be passed on to other third parties for their own purposes without your consent.
Duration of storage
The data must be deleted as soon as they are no longer required for the processing purposes mentioned. User interactions tracked on websites are stored for no longer than one year.
3) Cookie Consent with Usercentrics
This website uses the cookie consent technology of Usercentrics. Usercentrics GmbH is the recipient of your data within the meaning of Art. 13. Paragraph 1. e) GDPR. As part of the order processing, Kapsch TrafficCom transmits personal data (consent data) to Usercentrics GmbH, Sendlingerstr. 7, 80331 Munich as a processor. Consent data means the following: date and time of the visit or consent / rejection, device information. The data is processed for the purpose of compliance with legal obligations (obligation to provide evidence in accordance with Art. 7 Paragraph 1 GDPR) and the associated documentation of consents and thus on the basis of Art. 6 Paragraph 1 lit. c) GDPR. Local storage is used to store the data, and the consent data is stored for 3 years. The data is stored in the European Union. Further information on the collected data and contact options can be found at
usercentrics.com/privacy-policy
.
4) YouTube
We use videos from the YouTube portal of the company Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland on our website. The implementation is based on Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. f DSGVO, whereby our interest lies in the smooth integration of video content and an appealing design of our website.
When you call up a URL with an embedded video, a connection to the Google servers is established and thus the video content is displayed on the website by notifying the browser.
By using YouTube, personal data is collected, transferred, stored, disclosed and used by Google Ireland Limited and transferred to and stored in the United States and any other country in which Google Ireland Limited operates, regardless of your residence. For more information about privacy in connection with YouTube, please see
Google's Privacy Policy
.
5) Contact form or email
Purpose and scope
You have the option of requesting information about our company, our products and activities or events via a contact form on our website or by email. When you contact us, the data you provide (first and last name, contact information, content of your inquiry and any other information provided by you) is processed by us in order to answer your question or process your request.
You may freely decide whether to provide us with your data for your inquiry. However, if you do not provide us with this data, we may not be able to process your request accordingly.
Legal basis
The data processing in consequence of your contacting us takes place according to Art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 point b GDPR in order to process your inquiry.
Data recipients
For saving and hosting of the personal data, we make use of an IT service provider, who on our behalf and under our instructions has access to personal data in order to provide the ordered IT services.
Storage duration
g
The data is retained for as long as contact exists with the data subject, however, no longer than up to one year after your last contact with us.
6) Sending of annual reports
Purpose and scope
You have the option of requesting a printed copy of the annual report by mail; this request can be submitted by telephone, email or via the contact page on our
investor relations website
. We require your first and last name and postal address.
You may freely decide whether to provide us with this data. However, if you do not provide this data, we cannot send you the annual report.
Legal basis
The data processing in consequence of your contacting us takes place according to Art. 6 para. 1, point b GDPR in order to properly process your inquiry.
Data recipients
For saving and hosting of the personal data, we make use of an IT service provider, who on our behalf and under our instructions has access to personal data in order to provide the ordered IT services.
Storage duration
The data are saved by us for up to three months after sending of the annual report to you in order to allow for answering of inquiries concerning the delivery.
7) Newsletter
Purpose and scope
You can register for our newsletter and other mailings in order to obtain information about current topics at our company, our services, events and other items.
In addition to your email address, your name is also a required entry on some forms for sending the newsletter in order for us to address you personally in the newsletter. In some registration forms, you can voluntarily also provide other data (e.g. address).
In addition, the following data is also collected along with your registration: IP address of the visiting computer and the date and time of your registration. The collection of this data within the framework of the registration process serves to prevent a misuse of the services or the utilized email address.
We use the newsletter tool provider eyepin (eyepin GmbH, Billrothstraße 52, 1190 Vienna) for sending and analyzing newsletters.
As part of the newsletter dispatch, we can analyze the behavior of the recipient (e.g. how many recipients have opened a newsletter or how often a link was clicked.) With the help of conversion tracking, it can also be measured if a defined action was carried out after clicking a link.
You can find further information on data protection at eyepin here:
www.eyepin.com/datenschutz
Legal basis
The legal basis for the aforementioned data processing is Art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 point a GDPR. In using the data for this purpose, the requirements under telecommunications law, in particular § 174 TKG 2021 (Telecommunications Act) are complied with.
Data recipients
We make use of IT and marketing service providers for sending out the newsletter, who have access to personal data only on our behalf and according to our instructions in order to carry out the contracted services.
Revocation of consent
The subscription to the newsletter can be ended at any time. In every mailing, you have the option of easily declining the receipt of future newsletters and emails electronically at no charge.
Storage duration
The data arising in this regard is stored for as long as you remain subscribed to the newsletter and therefore until the revocation of consent.
8) Direct advertising
Purpose and scope
We utilize your personal data, insofar as you provide this in the course of an inquiry via a contact form or email or for receipt of the newsletter, for the purposes of direct advertising in order to provide you with general information about our the activities and products of KAPSCH and to organize our marketing strategies accordingly, unless you object to the use of your data for this purpose in advance.
Legal basis
The performance of direct marketing is a legitimate interest of ours in order to optimally reach interested parties and business partners. The legal basis for the processing is therefore the existence of a legitimate interest according to Art. 6 para. 1 point f GDPR.
In using the data for this purpose, the requirements under telecommunications law, in particular § 174 TKG 2021 (Telecommunications Act) are complied with.
Data recipients
For saving and hosting of the personal data, we make use of an IT service provider, who on our behalf and under our instructions also has access to personal data in some circumstances in order to provide the ordered IT services.
We also make use of service providers for the provision of marketing services and the execution of marketing campaigns, in particular for the sending of mailings.
Storage duration
We save your data for up to three years after your last contact with us, unless you object to the use of your data at an earlier point in time.
9) Investor relations contact database
Purpose and scope
The investor relations contact database, where the personal data from investor meet-ups as well as for everyone who would like to be informed of capital market issues by Kapsch TrafficCom (e.g. investors, securities brokers, banks, attorneys, analysts) are saved, is intended to support the maintenance of relationships with the capital market, in particular via sending currently relevant information about the company. The saved personal information includes the name, email address, company, address, role, telephone number, information on the last contact (date, place, type of contact, organized by whom) as well as information on share volumes.
Legal basis
The investor relations activities represent, on one hand, a legitimate interest of ours in order to optimally reach the capital market (legal justification is therefore Art. 6 para. 1 point f GDPR); on the other hand, we can respond to your inquiries in this way, to which extent we refer to Art. 6 para. 1 point b GDPR.
Data recipients
For saving and hosting of the personal data, we make use of an IT service provider, who on our behalf and under our instructions also has access to personal data in some circumstances in order to provide the ordered IT services.
Storage duration
We save your data as long as you have not objected to the processing of your personal data for this purpose.
10) Event management
Purpose and scope
We process your personal data as an interested party or as a participant in events for the organization and management of events and participation in these events as well as for managing the sending of invitations and other related documents.
Legal basis
Because we process the data only in order to process your inquiry or for your participation in an event, we refer to Art. 6 para. 1 point b GDPR as the legal basis for this, in other words the fulfillment of a request/contract.
Data recipients
We make use of service providers for the provision of services in connection with the organization of events, and this requires access to personal data; however, this takes place only according to our instructions.
Storage duration
We store the data for the sending of event information until the end of the event or until revocation of consent.
Information about your rights as data subject
Right to object, right to access, rectification, data portability, restriction and erasure
Art. 15 GDPR: You have the right at any time to obtain from us information on what data about you is being stored within the framework of your inquiry or registration and to correct your data.
Art. 16 GDPR: You can demand the rectification or completion of inaccurate or incomplete data.
Art. 20 GDPR: In addition, you have the right to obtain your data in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format. At your request, your data will also be sent directly to other providers, if this is technically possible.
Art. 18 GDPR: You have the right in specific cases to request the restriction of the processing of your data. A restriction results in the continued storage of your data but that no other processing steps will be taken by us with regard to your data and your application. You can demand a restriction if: (i) You have disputed the accuracy of the personal data, or (ii) the processing is illegal and you decline erasure, or (iii) the data is no longer needed for the processing purpose but under circumstances could be needed for establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims.
Art. 17 GDPR: You have the right to the erasure of data under certain circumstances, such as when it is not being processed according to the data protection requirements.
Art. 21 GDPR: You have the right, on grounds relating to your particular situation, at any time to object to the processing of personal data concerning you that takes place on the basis of Art. 6 para. 1 point e or f GDPR.
Right of complaint and supervisory authority
Notwithstanding the option of an action in regional court according to Section 29 para. 2 Data Protection Act 2018 and any other legal remedy, you have the right to lodge a complaint with the national supervisory authority of your place of residence if unlawful processing of personal data is presumed. In Austria, the Data Protection Authority is responsible.
Contact
In regard to data protection issues as well as for exercising your right to object and right to access, data portability and restriction or for rectification or erasure of your data, please contact us at the email address:
ktc.info@kapsch.net
Our data protection officer can be reached at the following email address:
privacy@kapsch.net
If your requests according to this Privacy Statement are not complied with within one month, you have the right to lodge a complaint with the Data Protection Authority.
Updates and amendments
Portions of this Privacy Statement may be amended or updated by us for technical or legal reasons without your prior notification by us. Please always examine the current Privacy Statement version to be informed of possible changes or updates.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://usercentrics.com/privacy-policy/:
Skip to content
Privacy Policy
www.usercentrics.com
Last update: March 3rd, 2025
Your privacy is important to us. This Privacy Policy covers what we collect and how we use, disclose, transfer and store your information.
I. NAME OF THE PERSON RESPONSIBLE
The person responsible within the meaning of the GDPR and other national data protection laws of the member states as well as other data protection regulations is the
Usercentrics GmbH
Sendlinger Straße 7
80331 Munich
Germany
E-mail:
datenschutz@usercentrics.com
| Website: www.usercentrics.com
II. DATA PROTECTION OFFICER
You can contact our data protection officer under:
SECUWING GmbH & Co. KG
Maximilian Hartung
Frauentorstr. 9
86152 Augsburg
Germany
E-mail:
epost@datenschutz-agentur.de
| Phone: +49 821 90786450 | Fax: +49 821 90786459
III. GENERAL INFORMATION ABOUT THE COLLECTION AND PROCESSING OF YOUR DATA
1. Scope of processing
In principle, we process personal data only insofar as this is necessary to provide a functioning website and our content and services. The processing of personal data of our users takes place regularly only with the consent of the user. An exception applies to cases in which prior consent can not be obtained for reasons of fact and the processing of the data is permitted by law.
2. Legal basis
Insofar as we obtain the consent of the data subject for processing of personal data, Art. 6 para.1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR serves as a legal basis.
If the processing of personal data is necessary for the performance of a contract to which the data subject is a party, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. b GDPR is a legal basis. This also applies to processing operations required to carry out pre-contractual actions.
Insofar as processing of personal data is required to fulfill a legal obligation that is subject to our company, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. c GDPR serves as the legal basis.
If processing is necessary to safeguard the legitimate interests of our company or a third party, and if the interests, fundamental rights and freedoms of the data subject do not prevail over the first interest, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. f GDPR serves as the legal basis for processing.
3. Storage and deletion of your data
In principle, we only store personal data for as long as is necessary to fulfill contractual or legal obligations for which we collected the data. After that, we delete the data immediately, unless we still need the data until the expiry of the statutory limitation period for evidence purposes for claims under civil law or due to statutory retention obligations.
For evidentiary purposes, we must retain contractual data for six years from the end of the year in which the business relationship with you ends. Any claims become statute-barred at this point at the earliest according to the statutory limitation period.
Even after this, we still have to store some of your data for accounting reasons. We are obliged to do so because of legal documentation obligations that may arise from the German Commercial Code, the German Fiscal Code, the German Banking Act, the German Money Laundering Act and the German Securities Trading Act. The periods specified there for the retention of documents are two to ten years.
We delete or block the personal data of the data subject as soon as the purpose of the storage is fulfilled. It may also be stored if provided for by the European or national legislator in EU regulations, laws or regulations to which our company is subject. Blocking or deletion of the data also takes place when a storage period prescribed by the standards mentioned expires, unless there is a need for further storage of the data for conclusion of a contract or fulfillment of the contract.
4. Please note
Your consent data will be processed for the use of this website and the use of the implemented Consent Management Platform. We use the Google Cloud Platform, provided by Google Cloud EMEA Ltd. The servers are located in Germany and Belgium. We would like to inform you that we cannot exclude the fact that data may be transferred to the US and may be subject to access by the US security authorities in accordance with 50 U.S.C. §1881(b)(4), 50 U.S.C. §1881a (= FISA 702). In the event that personal data is transferred to the USA or other third countries, we have taken necessary measures with Google in accordance with Art. 44 et seq. GDPR. More information can be found in the Data Protection references of Google. Additionally we have taken further safety measures to ensure the security of the data.
IV. PROVISION OF THE WEBSITE AND CREATION OF LOG FILES
1. Scope of processing
Each time our website is accessed, our system automatically collects data and information from the computer system of the calling computer. This is e.g. information like
Information about the type and version of your internet browser,
The operating system of your computer or smartphone,
Your internet service provider,
Your IP address,
Date and time of your access,
Geographic location,
Websites from which you came to us,
Websites that you visit from our site.
When applicable – Referrer URL from Partner Website.
We collect such technical information in so-called “log files”, so that you can display our website correctly and we can identify the causes of any technical problems, for the technical optimization of our websites and for the purpose of the security of our computer systems and networks. For these purposes, we have a legitimate interest in the processing of data according to Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. f GDPR.
The data will be deleted as soon as it is no longer necessary for the purpose of its collection. Typically, this technical information will be erased or rendered unrecognizable at the latest after seven days.
The collection of data for the provision of the website and the storage of the data in log files is essential for the operation of the website.
V. CONTACT REQUESTS FOR PRODUCT INFORMATION, A DEMO OR OTHER CONCERNS
1. Description and scope of data processing
On our website you can contact us via various options: e.g. contact form, book a demo, request a quote, request product information, request guides. If you make use of these options, the data entered in the input mask will be transmitted to us and saved. In addition to the specific input macro data, the IP address and the date and time of the request are collected and stored.
Alternatively, a contact via e-mail address is possible. In this case, your personal data transmitted by e-mail will be stored.
In this context, there will be no disclosure of the data to third parties, unless this is necessary for the processing of the query (for example, demo booking tool). In any case, the data will be used exclusively for processing the conversation, unless agreed upon otherwise.
2. Legal basis for processing
Legal basis for the processing of the data is in general consent of the user, art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR.
3. Purpose of the data processing
The processing of personal data from the input mask is solely for the processing of your request. In the case of contact via e-mail, this also includes the required legitimate interest in the processing of the data.
The other personal data processed during the sending process serve to prevent misuse of the contact form and to ensure the security of our information technology systems.
4. Duration of storage
If you have booked a demo, requested product information or an offer, we reserve the right to store the data for two years to measure the profitability of our sales and marketing. Otherwise, we will delete the data as soon as it is no longer necessary to achieve the purpose of its collection. For the personal data entered in the contact form and those sent by e-mail, this is the case when the respective conversation with you has ended. The conversation is ended when it can be inferred from the circumstances that the relevant facts have been finally clarified.
5. Revoking consent and removal possibility
You have the possibility at any time to revoke your consent to the processing of the personal data. If you contact us by e-mail, you may object to the storage of his personal data at any time. In such a case, the conversation can not continue. All personal data stored in the course of contacting will be deleted in this case.
VI. NEWSLETTER, PRODUCT RECOMMENDATIONS, WEBINARS,CUSTOMER SURVEYS AND PARTNER PORTAL
1. Newsletter
When signing up for the Newsletter, data entered into the input mask will also be stored, in order to provide the Newsletter. The legal basis for this processing is art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR. Your e-mail address, time of subscription and the IP address used for subscribing will be retained as long as you subscribe to our Newsletter. This service is provided by means of a double opt-in. Thus, you will receive an e-mail containing a link by which you can confirm that you are the owner of the e-mail address and wish to be notified via our e-mail service. You can unsubscribe from this service at any time by contacting us at
unsubcribe@usercentrics.com
or by opting out via the link provided in each Newsletter any time.
2. Product Recommendations
You will be informed by Usercentrics about relevant changes concerning the Services, such as the implementation of additional functions, by e-mail, if you purchase the Usercentrics product. The legal basis for this is Art. 6 Para. 1 lit. f GDPR in conjunction with § 7 Para. 3 UWG, justified by our interest in sending you individual offers.
3. Webinars
Usercentrics offers from time to time webinars, to which you can sign up from our website. In these cases the data put in the sign-up form during the sign-up process will be used by Usercentrics for the purposes of the webinar and communication regarding the webinar and other relevant topics. If the webinar is organized together with a partner, then the data might be shared with them. The data is processed on the legal basis of consent, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR. You have the right to withdraw your consent to process your data at any time by contacting
unsubscribe@usercentrics.com
.
4. Customer Surveys
If you place an order with us, we will also use your e-mail address to send you customer and satisfaction surveys. We will use the results of the surveys to improve our products and services. The legal basis for this is Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a GDPR, if you have given your consent. In some cases Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f GDPR might apply, justified by our legitimate interest in constantly improving our service.
5. Preference Management Platform
We use the Usercentrics Preference Management Platform, in order to provide you as a recipient of our newsletter and other kinds of communication the option to choose which kinds of communication you want to receive. You can change your settings and preferences at any time. By using this service your e-mail address and the preference decision will be stored. This data is used in order for us to be able to send communication based on your preferences. The above mentioned data is only processed with your consent (Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR). You can withdraw your consent at any time. The data is not shared with any third parties.
6. Partner Portal
We use the Usercentrics Partner Portal as a Partner Management tool. When using the Partner Portal, the personal data of our Partners might be processed. This can include the following information: name, e-mail address, company name and information, information about signed deals (deal data, partner tier, etc.), information on the partner’s clients (including e-mail address and name), behavior in the Partner Portal, and possibly transactional information. This data is processed in order to fulfill our contractual relationship. The data is kept for as long as necessary to fulfill the purpose. Data collected is not shared with third parties.
7. Support tickets
When you create a support ticket with Usercentrics, we will be process the data that you have entered into the ticket, for the purposes of evaluating and responding to your request. In this case, we use the service Zendesk provided by Zendesk, Inc., 1019 Market Street, San Francisco, CA 94103, USA (hereinafter Zendesk) as a support system, which allows users to communicate with Usercentrics. In order to do so the data entered into the ticket will be processed (name, e-mail address, etc.) as well as the IP aAddress will be processed. The legal basis for the processing is consent (Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR). When creating a ticket through Zendesk, you also accept the use of following features on Zendesk: Zendesk Advanced AI, Intelligent triage, Intelligence in the context panel, Generative AI for agents, Macro suggestions for admins, Autoreply and internal note trigger actions, and Generative AI for Help Center. You can find further information on Zendesk’s usage of AI
here
. The data will be deleted as soon as it is no longer necessary to achieve the purpose of its collection.
For more information on how data is processed by Zendesk, you can visit Zendesk’s
privacy policy
or contact Zendesk at
privacy@zendesk.com
.
VII. YOU BECOME A CUSTOMER OR PARTNER OF USERCENTRICS
1. Description and scope of data processing
You can become a customer or partner of Usercentrics. The following data is collected during the registration process:
your e-mail address
first name and last name
if necessary company affiliation,
payment information (possibly the company)
other data that we request from you, and
possibly data that we receive in the course of the business relationship.
2. Legal basis for processing
Legal basis for the processing of the data is in the presence of the consent of the user art. 6 para 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR and art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. b GDPR, since the registration of the fulfillment of a contract or the implementation of pre-contractual measures.
3. Purpose of the data processing
Registration is required to fulfill the customer or partner contract or to carry out pre-contractual measures.
4. Opposition and removal possibility
As a customer you always have the option to cancel your account. You can change the data stored about you at any time. If the data is required to fulfill a contract or to carry out pre-contractual measures, premature deletion of the data is only possible, unless contractual or legal obligations preclude deletion.
5. Embedded Links
In case you sign up for our services, please note that we evaluate your user behavior when you register for our service. We record your campaign behavior. Embedded links contain UTM parameters and other identifiers which will identify all parameters of your “clicks”.
The UTM parameters and other identifiers allow us to add trackable extensions to your URLs. The parameters are:
Medium: this parameter describes the medium in which the link is embedded. Examples: email, social media or website.
Source: with this UTM parameter we define the source of the link. This can be newsletters, websites, apps or social media channels.
Campaign: this type of UTM parameter is used to identify the actual campaigns. For example, if we send you a newsletter every month, the individual newsletters can be evaluated separately.
Term: keywords, so that the link can be identified better.
Content: within a campaign we insert different elements to be tracked in order to identify them clearly and evaluate them separately. Examples: button, image or video.
Coupons: identifiers added to a campaign in order to track interactions with a campaign element or apply a discount.
The identifiers are generated by the service providers listed in section IX. of this privacy policy. We use the identifiers in combination with conversion events, such as account creation (for example, if a trial period starts or you upgrade to a premium account) to inform the service providers about the event in relation to the provided identifiers.
VIII. COOKIES AND TRACKING TECHNOLOGIES
1. What are Cookies?
Web Browser Cookies: A web browser cookie is a small text file sent from a website to your computer or mobile device where it is stored by your web browser. Web browser cookies may store information such as your IP address or other identifier, your browser type, and information about the content you display and interact with on the digital services. By storing such information, web browser cookies can store your preferences and settings for online services and analyze how you use online services.
Tracking Technologies: Web Beacons, Pixels, Tags, Scripts.
E-mails and mobile applications can contain small, transparent image files or lines of code to record how you interact with them. This information is used to help website and app publishers better analyze and improve their services.
2. Use, legal basis and purpose
We use cookies to make our website more user-friendly. Some elements of our website require that the calling browser be identified even after a page break. Cookies as well as the storage of data in the local storage only allow functionalities which should contribute to a positive user experience on our website. We do not use cookies with personal data without given consent.
In addition, we use cookies on our website that allow an analysis of users’ browsing behavior.
When accessing our website, the user is informed about the use of cookies for analytics purposes and his consent to the processing of the personal data used in this context is obtained.
The legal basis for the processing of personal data using technically necessary cookies is Article 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. f GDPR. The purpose of using technically necessary cookies is to facilitate the use of websites for users. Some features of our website can not be offered without the use of cookies. For these, it is necessary that the browser is recognized even after a page break. We require cookies for the following applications: acceptance of language settings. The user data collected through technically necessary cookies will not be used to create user profiles.
The legal basis for the processing of personal data using cookies for analytics purposes is the consent of the user Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a GDPR. The use of the analytics cookies is for the purpose of improving the quality of our website and its contents. Through the analytics cookies, we learn how the website is used and so we can constantly optimize our offer.
3. Duration of storage, objection and disposal options
Cookies are stored on the computer of the user and transmitted to our side. Therefore, as a user, you have full control over the use of cookies. By changing the settings in your internet browser, you can disable or restrict the transmission of cookies. Already saved cookies can be deleted at any time. This can also be done automatically. If cookies are disabled for our website, it may not be possible to use all the functions of the website to the full.
4. Recipients of data
We only pass on the data we have collected if this is necessary for the fulfillment of the contract or for the provision of the technical functionality of the website, or if there is another legal basis for passing on the data.
In principle, we process your data ourselves. In some cases, however, we also use service providers. In addition to the service providers mentioned in this privacy policy, these may include, in particular, data centers that store our website and databases, IT service providers that maintain our systems, and consulting companies. If we pass on data to service providers, they may only use the data to fulfill their tasks. The service providers have been carefully selected and commissioned by us. They are contractually bound to our instructions, have suitable technical and organizational measures in place to protect the rights of the data subjects and are regularly monitored by us.
In addition, disclosure may take place in connection with official enquiries, court orders and legal proceedings if it is necessary for legal prosecution or enforcement. When governments make a lawful demand for customer data from Usercentrics, Usercentrics strives to limit the disclosure. Usercentrics will only release specific data mandated by the relevant legal demand.
If compelled to disclose your data, Usercentrics will promptly notify you and provide a copy of the demand unless legally prohibited from doing so.
If Usercentrics commissions third parties with the collection, processing and use of data within the scope of commissioned processing in accordance with Art. 28 GDPR, this will also take place exclusively in compliance with the statutory provisions on data protection.
IX. IMPLEMENTED TECHNOLOGIES
1. Third Party Technologies used on Website
Zapier
We are using the service Zapier as workflow automation software. The service is provided by Zapier Inc., 548 Market St., # 62411, San Francisco, California 94104, United States of America. This service is used to transfer information entered into forms on our website to our systems. Additionally, information like IP Address might be processed through the service. Legal basis for the usage of this service is legitimate interest, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. f GDPR, as the service is required to transfer the input to our internal systems. The data will be deleted as soon as it is no longer necessary to achieve the purpose for its collection. This service might transfer data outside of the EU/EEA. For that case we have signed standard contractual clauses with the service provider.
For more information on how data is processed by Zapier, you can visit Zapier’s
privacy policy
or contact Zapier at
privacy@zapier.com
.
LinkedIn Leads
We are using the service provided by LinkedIn Leads for lead generation. When signing up for Usercentrics events or content on LinkedIn, we will process your data. The email address will be used for sending the resources, and for direct advertising and contact initiation in the context of the products and services we offer. The data is also shared with Google Ads for the purpose of retargeting. Additionally, the data will be shared with Expandi.io (ProfitSoft B.V., Meerenakkerplein 51, Eindhoven, 5652BJ, the Netherlands), for the automation of communication and interaction on LinkedIn . You can find further information
here
.
The collection of the data does not take place on the Usercentrics website, but on the sign-up forms on LinkedIn. The legal basis is consent, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR. You can revoke your consent at any time.
Personio
We are using the service Personio as applicant management software. The service is provided by Personio GmbH, Rundfunkplatz 4, 80335 Munich, Germany. The legal basis is consent, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR. You can revoke your consent at any time. The data will be stored for a period of 60 days after the application process has been concluded. For further information on how data is processed by Personio, you can visit Personio’s
privacy policy
or contact Personio at privacy@personio.com.
Storylane
We are using the service provided by Storylane Inc. as an interactive demo platform. The service is provided by Storylane Inc., 2261 Market Street #4813, San Francisco, CA 94114, United States of America. The service is used as an interactive demo platform, in order to provide demo’s on the website, which users can use to guide themselves through the product demo. When using this service, data like the IP Address, might be processed. The legal basis is consent, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR. You can revoke your consent at any time. This service might transfer data outside of the EU/EEA. For that case we have signed standard contractual clauses with the service provider.
For more information on how data is processed by Storylane, you can visit Storylane’s
privacy policy
or contact Storylane at
privacy@storylane.io
.
Zoom
We are using the service provided by Zoom as a video conferencing service. The service is provided by Zoom Video Communications Inc., 55 Almaden Boulevard, 6th Floor, San Jose, CA 95113, United States of America. The service is used as a video conferencing service in order to host webinars and other types of video conferences. The legal basis is consent, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR. You can revoke your consent at any time. This service might transfer data outside of the EU/EEA. For that case we have signed standard contractual clauses with the service provider and the provider is included in the
Data Privacy Framework List
.
For more information on how data is processed by Zoom, you can visit Zoom’s
privacy policy
or contact Zoom at privacy@zoom.us.
SayMine Technologies
We use the service MineOS provided by SayMine Technologies Ltd., Alon 1 Tower, 94 Yigal Alon St, Tel Aviv-Yafo, 6789139, Israel (hereinafter SayMine) in order to provide a data privacy request management tool. In order to do so the name, email address and other data shared by the requester may be processed. The legal basis for the processing is legal obligation (Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. c GDPR), as the service is used in order to fulfill the legal obligations of responding to requests for exercising the data subjects’ rights under the GDPR. The data will be deleted as soon as it is no longer necessary to achieve the purpose of its collection.
For more information on how data is processed by SayMine, you can visit SayMine’s
privacy policy
or contact SayMine at
portal@saymine.com
.
Stripe
We are using the service provided by Stripe as an online payment system. The service is provided by Stripe, Inc., 3180 18th Street, San Francisco, CA 94110, United States of America. The service is used in order to enable the payment process on the website. Legal basis is performance of a contract, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. b GDPR, as this service is required in order to be able to finalize the purchase process. When using this service data, like the payment information (including payment card information), purchase information, as well as IP Address, might be processed. This service might transfer data outside of the EU/EEA. For that case we have signed standard contractual clauses with the service provider and the provider is included in the
Data Privacy Framework List
.
For more information on how data is processed by Stripe, you can visit Stripe’s
privacy policy
or contact Stripe at
privacy@stripe.com
.
Chili Piper
We are using the service provided by Chili Piper as a booking and meeting platform, in order to provide our users the ability to schedule meetings with our teams, as well as for video conferencing. The service is provided by Chili Piper, Inc., 228 Park Ave. S., #78136, New York, New York 10003-1502, United States of America. The legal basis is consent, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR. You can revoke your consent at any time. When using this service data, such as meeting date, time and title, guest list, first name, last name, and e-mail address might be processed. This service might transfer data outside of the EU/EEA. For that case we have agreed on standard contractual clauses with the service provider.
For more information on how data is processed by Chili Piper, you can visit Chili Piper’s
privacy policy
or contact Chili Piper at
support@chilipiper.com
.
Pardot
We are using the service provided by Pardot as customer relationship management software, in order to manage marketing automation and lead generation. The service is provided by Salesforce, Erika-Mann-Straße 31-37, 80636 Munich, Germany. The legal basis is consent, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR. You can revoke your consent at any time. When using this service, data such as first and last name, contact information, e-mail address, company information, as well as IP Address might be processed.
For more information on how data is processed by Pardot, you can visit Pardot’s
privacy policy
or contact Pardot at
privacy@salesforce.com
.
Google Customer Match
We use Google Customer Match for marketing and retargeting purposes. This service is provided by Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, 4 Barrow Street, Dublin D04 E5W5, Ireland. When using this service, data, such as first and last name, as well as e-mail address, will be processed. The legal basis is consent, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR. You can revoke your consent at any time. This service might transfer data outside of the EU/EEA. For that case we have signed standard contractual clauses with the service provider and the provider is included in the
Data Privacy Framework List
. For more information on how data is processed by Google, you can visit Google’s
privacy policy
.
Meta Custom Audiences
We use Meta Custom Audiences for marketing and retargeting purposes. This service is provided by Meta Platform Ireland Ltd., 4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin, D02, Ireland. When using this service, data, such as first and last name, as well as e-mail address, might be processed. The legal basis is consent, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR. You can revoke your consent at any time. This service might transfer data outside of the EU/EEA. For that case we have signed standard contractual clauses with the service provider and the provider is included in the
Data Privacy Framework List
. For more information on how data is processed by Meta, you can visit Meta’s
privacy policy
.
LinkedIn Matched Audiences
We use LinkedIn Matched Audiences for marketing and retargeting purposes. This service is provided by LinkedIn Ireland Unlimited Company, Wilton Place, Dublin 2, Ireland. When using this service, data, such as first and last name, as well as e-mail address, might be processed. The legal basis is consent, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR. You can revoke your consent at any time. This service might transfer data outside of the EU/EEA. For that case we have signed standard contractual clauses with the service provider and the provider is included in the
Data Privacy Framework List
. For more information on how data is processed by LinkedIn, you can visit LinkedIn’s
privacy policy
.
2. Recipients of data
Usercentrics does not sell, trade or otherwise transfer to outside parties any personally identifiable information.
This does not include trusted third parties or processors that assist us in operating our website, conducting our business, or servicing you. Such trusted parties may have access to personally identifiable information on a need to know basis and will be contractually obliged to keep your information confidential.
We will also share data among the Usercentrics entities (Usercentrics A/S, Usercentrics GmbH, Cybot A/S (including CYBOT A/S, odštěpný závod office in Prague), Usercentrics Unipessoal, Usercentrics Inc.), here also including sharing data among Cookiebot™ and Usercentrics products when needed. All the entities may have access to personally identifiable information on a need to know basis and will be contractually obliged to keep your information confidential (joint controller agreement).
We may also release your information when we believe release is appropriate to comply with the law, enforce our site policies, or protect our rights or the rights of others, property, or safety. Furthermore, non-personally identifiable visitor information may be provided to other parties for marketing, advertising, or other uses.
We only pass on the data we have collected if this is necessary for the fulfillment of the contract or for the provision of the technical functionality of the website, or if there is another legal basis for passing on the data.
In principle, we process your data ourselves. In some cases, however, we also use service providers. In addition to the processors mentioned in this privacy policy, these may include, in particular, data centers that store our websites and databases, IT service providers that maintain our systems, and consulting companies. If we pass on data to processors, they may only use the data to fulfill their tasks. The processors have been carefully selected and commissioned by us. They are contractually bound by our instructions, have suitable technical and organizational measures in place to protect the rights of the data subjects and are regularly monitored by us.
In addition, disclosure may take place in connection with official enquiries, court orders and legal proceedings if it is necessary for legal prosecution or enforcement. When governments make a lawful demand for customer data from Usercentrics, Usercentrics strives to limit the disclosure. Usercentrics will only release specific data mandated by the relevant legal demand.
If compelled to disclose your data, Usercentrics will promptly notify you and provide a copy of the demand unless legally prohibited from doing so.
If Usercentrics commissions third parties with the collection, processing, and use of data within the scope of commissioned processing in accordance with Art. 28 GDPR, this will also take place exclusively in compliance with the statutory provisions on data protection.
Matomo Opt-Out
X. CALIFORNIA CONSUMER PRIVACY ACT COMPLIANCE
In addition to the above mentioned, the following provisions apply specifically for residents of California, USA.
The California privacy laws provide residents with specific rights regarding their personal information. This section describes the consumers’ rights and explains how to exercise those rights, subject to exceptions under the law.
1. Your rights under California Privacy Law
Right to Know About Personal Information Collected, Sold or Shared (“Right to Know”)
You have the right to request to know what personal information we have collected about you, including:
The categories of personal information collected
The categories of sources from which the personal information is collected
The business or commercial purpose for collecting or selling personal information
The categories of third parties to whom the personal information is shared
The specific pieces of personal information collected about you that are permitted by law
Right To Request Deletion of Personal Information (“Right to Delete”)
You have the right to request that we delete any of your personal information that we collect, subject to certain exceptions. Once we receive your request
and verify your identity
, we will delete (and direct our service providers to delete) your Personal Information from our records, unless an exception applies.
Right to Correct Inaccurate Personal Information (“Right to Correct”)
You have the right to request correction of inaccurate personal information that we maintain about you or update the information we have on file.
Right to Opt Out of Sale or Sharing of Your Personal Information
You have the right to opt out of the sale or sharing of personal information. Usercentrics does not sell personal information, including personal information of minors under the age of 16. You can make use of your right to opt out of the sale or sharing of personal information by clicking the “Do Not Sell Or Share My Personal Information” link at the bottom of the page.
Right to Non-Discrimination For The Exercise Of Your Privacy Rights
You have the right to be protected from discrimination for exercising your rights. We will not discriminate against you for exercising your rights.
Right to Limit the Use of Sensitive Personal Information
Usercentrics does not use sensitive personal information in any manner that requires offering a right to limit its use.
2. How To Submit a Request to Exercise Your Right to Know, Delete, or Correct
You may submit your request by sending an email to privacy@usercentrics.com. We will compare the information you submit to us with the information we have in our records to ensure your request meets the definition of “verifiable consumer request” under the California Privacy Laws. We will then respond to your request in accordance with the requirements.
Response Timing and Format
Usercentrics endeavors to respond to a request within forty-five (45) days of its receipt. If Usercentrics requires more time (up to 90 days), you will be informed of the reason and extension period in writing. Any disclosures provided will only cover the twelve (12) month period preceding the receipt of the verifiable request. If applicable, the response will also explain the reasons for which Usercentrics cannot comply with a request. For data portability requests, Usercentrics will select a format to provide the Personal Information that is readily usable and should allow transmission of the information from one entity to another entity without hindrance. Usercentrics does not charge a fee to process or respond to the verifiable request unless it is excessive, repetitive, or manifestly unfounded. If Usercentrics determines that the request warrants a fee, we will inform why Usercentrics made that decision and provide a cost estimate before completing the request.
3. Children Under the Age of 16
Usercentrics does not knowingly collect or disclose the personal information of children under the age of 16. As stated above, Usercentrics also does not sell or share personal information, including personal information, of children under the age of 16.
XI. MINORS
Our services are not aimed at children under 13 years. We do not knowingly collect information from children under the age of 13. If you have not reached the age limit, do not use the services and do not provide us with your personal information. If you are a parent of a child below the age limit and you learn that your child has provided Usercentrics personal information, please contact us at
datenschutz@usercentrics.com
and insist on exercising your rights of access, correction, cancellation and / or opposition. If you are resident in California and are under 16 years of age and wish to erase publicly available content, please contact us at
datenschutz@usercentrics.com.
XII. ONLINE PRESENCE IN SOCIAL NETWORKS
We maintain online presences in social networks in order to communicate there with customers and interested parties, among others, and to provide information about our products and services.
The users’ data is usually processed by the social networks concerned for market research and advertising purposes. In this way, usage profiles can be created based on the interests of the users. For this purpose, cookies and other identifiers are stored on the users’ computers. On the basis of these usage profiles, advertisements, for example, are then placed within the social networks but also on third-party websites.
As part of the operation of our online presences, it is possible that we can access information such as statistics on the use of our online presences, which are provided by the social networks. These statistics are aggregated and may include, in particular, demographic information and data on interaction with our online presences and the posts and content distributed via them. Please refer to the list below for details and links to the data of the social networks that we can access as operators of the online presences.
The legal basis for data processing is Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a and b, in order to stay in contact with and inform our customers and to carry out pre-contractual measures with future customers and interested parties.
For the legal basis of the data processing carried out by the social networks on their own responsibility, please refer to the data protection information of the respective social network. The links below also provide you with further information on the respective data processing and the options to object.
We would like to point out that data protection requests can be asserted most efficiently with the respective provider of the social network, as only these providers have access to the data and can take appropriate measures directly. Below is a list with information on the social networks on which we operate online presences:
Facebook (USA and Canada: Facebook Inc., 1601 Willow Road, Menlo Park, California 94025, USA; all other countries: Facebook Ireland Ltd., 4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Ireland).
Operation of the Facebook fan page in joint responsibility on the basis of
an agreement on joint processing of personal data
(so-called Page Insights Supplement regarding the controller).
Information on the processed Page Insights data and the contact option in the event of data protection enquiries:
https://www.facebook.com/legal/terms/information_about_page_insights_data
Privacy policy:
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/
Opt-out:
https://www.facebook.com/settings?tab=ads and http://www.youronlinechoices.com
.
Instagram (Facebook Ireland Ltd., 4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Ireland).
Privacy policy:
https://help.instagram.com/519522125107875
Google/ YouTube (Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland).
Privacy policy: https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en
Opt-out:
https://www.google.com/settings/ads
.
Twitter (Twitter International Company, One Cumberland Place, Fenian Street, Dublin 2, D02 AX07 Ireland).
Privacy policy: https://twitter.com/en/privacy
Opt-Out:
https://twitter.com/personalization
.
LinkedIn (LinkedIn Ireland Unlimited Company Wilton Place, Dublin 2, Ireland).
Operation of the LinkedIn company page in joint responsibility on the basis of
an agreement on joint processing of personal data
(so-called Page Insights Joint Controller Addendum).
Information on the Page Insights data processed and the contact option in the event of data protection enquiries:
https://legal.linkedin.com/pages-joint-controller-addendum
Privacy policy:
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
Opt-out:
https://www.linkedin.com/psettings/guest-controls/retargeting-opt-out
.
Google my business
We operate a so-called Google My Business entry. Should you find us in this way, we make use of the information service offered by Google and the services of Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland (hereinafter “Google”).
We would like to point out that you use the Google site and its functions on your own responsibility. This applies in particular to the use of the social and interactive functions (e.g. commenting, sharing, rating, direct messaging). When you visit and interact with our Google My Business listing, Google also collects your IP address and other information that is present on your terminal device in the form of so-called cookies. This information is used to provide us, as the operator of the Google My Business listing, with statistical information about the use of Google services. The data collected about you in this context will be processed by Google and may be transferred to countries outside the European Union. Google generally describes what information it receives and how it is used in its privacy policy. Google provides more detailed information in its privacy policy:
Google privacy policy
We do not know how Google uses the data from the visit for its own purposes, to what extent activities of individual users are assigned, how long Google stores this data and whether data is passed on to third parties. When accessing Google services, the IP address assigned to your terminal device is transmitted to Google. Google also stores information about its users’ end devices; this may enable Google to assign IP addresses to individual users or user accounts.
If you contact us via our Google My Business entry or other Google services by direct message, we cannot rule out the possibility that these messages may also be read and evaluated by Google (both by employees and automatically). We therefore advise against providing us with personal data there. Instead, another form of communication should be chosen as early as possible. We delete conversations no later than 14 days after the last chat activity, or immediately after switching to another communication channel. The use of this service is subject to the Google Privacy Policy, which you – with use – have already agreed to.
We, as the provider of our Google My Business entry, do not collect or process any further data from your use of this Google service. Beyond that, we do not use any Google functions on our website.
XIII. DATA TRANSFER TO THIRD COUNTRIES
As explained in this privacy policy, we use services whose providers are partly located in so-called third countries (outside the European Union or the European Economic Area) or process personal data there, i.e. countries whose level of data protection does not correspond to that of the European Union. Where this is the case and the European Commission has not issued an adequacy decision (Art. 45 GDPR) for these countries, we have taken appropriate precautions to ensure an adequate level of data protection for any data transfers according to Art. 44 et seq. GDPR. These include, among others, the standard contractual clauses of the European Union or binding internal data protection regulations.
If a third country transfer is provided for and no adequacy decision or appropriate safeguards are in place, it is possible and there is a risk that authorities in the respective third country (e.g. intelligence services) may gain access to the transferred data in order to collect and analyze it, and that enforceability of your data subject rights cannot be guaranteed.
XIV. THIRD PARTY LINKS
Occasionally, at our discretion, we may include or offer third-party products or services on our website. These third-party sites have separate independent privacy policies. We therefore have no responsibility or liability for the content and activities of these linked websites. Nonetheless, we seek to protect the integrity of our website and welcome any feedback about these websites.
XV. YOUR RIGHTS
If we process your personal data you have – after successful identification – the following rights towards us:
Right to information (Article 15 GDPR, § 34 BDSG)
Right to deletion (Article 17 GDPR, § 35 BDSG)
Right to rectification (Article 16 GDPR, Section 34 BDSG)
Right to restriction of processing (Article 18 GDPR)
Right to data portability (Article 20 GDPR)
Right to withdraw consent (Article 7(3) GDPR)
Right to object to certain data processing activities (Article 21 GDPR).
In order to exercise your rights described here, you can contact us at any time using the contact details listed under “
Name of the person responsible
“.
You also have the right to complain to the data protection supervisory authority responsible for us. You can contact the data protection authority in your place of residence, which will then forward your request to the competent authority.
XVI. SECURITY AND INTEGRITY OF THE DATA
Protecting the information you give us or that we receive about you is our priority. We take appropriate security measures to protect your information from loss, misuse, and unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction. Usercentrics has taken measures to ensure the ongoing confidentiality, integrity, availability and resiliency of systems and services that process personal information, and will restore the availability and access to information in the event of a physical or technical incident in a timely manner.
XVII. UPDATES
We reserve the right to update this privacy policy from time to time. In the event that we make material changes that restrict Usercentrics’ rights or obligations under this Privacy Policy, we will publish a clear notice in this section of this Privacy Policy that informs users when they are updated.
Click
here
to see the previous Privacy Policy valid until March 2nd 2025.
Sub-policy 1
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps